Hawaii statutes.
§150-25 Vegetable seed; labels. Each
container of vegetable seed that is sold or offered for sale within the State
for planting purposes shall bear or have attached, in a conspicuous place, a
plainly written or printed label or tag in the English language, giving the
following information:

(1) Name of kind and variety of seed.

(2) For seed which germinates less than the standard
established by rules of the department:

(A) Percentage of germination, exclusive of
hard seed.

(B) Percentage of hard seed, if present.

(C) The calendar month and year the test was
completed to determine the percentages.

(D) The words "below standard" in
not less than eight-point type.

(3) Name and address of the person who labeled the
seed or who sells, offers, or exposes the seed for sale within the State.

The department, by rule, may require additional
information on the label or tag for vegetable seed that is packaged or
processed, such as pelleted or coated seed, and sold in specialized containers
such as packets, hermetically sealed containers, tapes, or any other innovative
method or container. [L 1945, c 90, pt of §2; RL 1955, §26-9; am L Sp 1959 2d,
c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; HRS §150-25; am L 1979, c 87, §3; am L 1987, c
164, §7; am L 1991, c 73, §5]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next